Hawaii, session 2026, GM1119.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 286-236, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a) No person shall be issued a commercial driver's
license unless that person:
(1) Meets the qualification standards of title 49 Code of
Federal Regulations, part 391, subparts B and E;
(2) Has passed a knowledge and driving skills test for
driving a commercial motor vehicle that'complies with
minimum federal standards established by federal
regulation enumerated in title 49 Code of Federal
Regulations, part 383, subparts G and H;
(3) [Haa Ha-waii as the state of domicile as defined in
title—49 Code e-f Fodora-l Regulations section-3^3.5; ]
Provides to the State proof of citizenship or lawful
permanent residency as specified in table 1 to
title 49 Code of Federal Regulations, section 383.71,
as amended October 14, 2021, or obtains a
2026-3393 HB1163 CDl HMSO
iimiiniiniiniiniim

Page 2 H.B. NO. -o’l
C.D. 1
non-domiciled commercial learner's permit or
non-domiciled commercial driver's license as provided
in title 49 Code of Federal Regulations^ section
383.71(f), that shall be issued as a non-domiciled
commercial learner's permit or non-domiciled
commercial driver's license; and
(4) Has satisfied all other requirements of the Commercial
Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1986, Public Law 99-570,
title XII, in addition to other requirements imposed
by state law or federal regulation.
The tests shall be prescribed by the director and administered
by the respective county examiner of drivers. The test
examiners shall communicate with the applicant only in English
during the skills test. As of January 30, 2012, the examiner of
drivers shall verify that the medical certification status of a
driver who self-certified according to title 49 Code of Federal
Regulations section 383.71(b)(1)(i), non-excepted interstate, is
certified. If a driver submits a current medical examiner's
certificate, the examiner of drivers shall date-stamp the
certificate and post all required information to the commercial
driver's license information system pursuant to title 49 Code of
2026-3393 HB1163 CDl HMSO

Page 3 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
Federal Regulations section 383.73(b)(5) and in accordance with
title 49 Code of Federal Regulations section 383.73{o). A
person who is not physically qualified to drive under title 49
Code of Federal Regulations section 391.41(b)(1) or (2) and who
is otherwise qualified to drive a motor vehicle may be granted
an intrastate waiver by the director. The process for granting
intrastate waivers shall be the same as that for interstate
waivers in title 49 Code of Federal Regulations section 391.49;
provided that the intrastate waiver requests shall be submitted
to the director."
SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracJceted
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-3393 HB1163 CDl HMSO

■■■nHiDmiliniiiv

H.B. NO. -’i
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 19th day of May , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1163, HD1,SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1163, H.D. 1, S.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 30, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
President of the Senate
Clerk of the Senate
3-26